Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-802.02
Public service entity; appeals.

On or before September 10, if a public service entity feels aggrieved, such public service entity may file an appeal with the Tax Commissioner. The Tax Commissioner shall act upon the appeal and shall issue a written order mailed to the entity within seven days after the date of the order. The order may be appealed within thirty days after the date of the order to the Tax Equalization and Review Commission in accordance with section 77-5013.

Laws 1997, LB 270, § 42;

Laws 2000, LB 968, § 41;

Laws 2004, LB 973, § 15;

Laws 2007, LB334, § 49.